Utah statutes.
59-10-1308.   Children's organ transplants contribution -- Credit to Kurt
Oscarson Children's Organ Transplant Trust Account.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 59-10-1304, a resident or nonresident
individual that files an individual income tax return under this chapter may
designate on the resident or nonresident individual's individual income tax
return a contribution to the Kurt Oscarson Children's Organ Transplant Trust
Account created by Section 26-18a-4.
(2)  The commission shall:
(a)  determine annually the total amount of contributions designated in
accordance with this section; and
(b)  credit the amount described in Subsection (2)(a) to the Kurt Oscarson
Children's Organ Transplant Trust Account created by Section 26-18a-4.
